Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3204, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3204. (a) The State Regents shall be a body corporate,


and shall adopt an official seal; and all contracts, official


documents, awards, degrees or other papers or instruments issued by


the State Regents and requiring the official signature of the State


Regents shall have the impression of such seal.


(b) The State Regents shall annually elect from its membership


a chairman, vice-chairman, secretary, and assistant secretary, each


of whom shall serve for a term of one (1) fiscal year. The chairman


shall be the presiding officer of the State Regents. He The


chairman shall, on behalf of the State Regents, subscribe the


official name thereof, and the secretary shall affix the official

Req. No. 3253 Page 1


seal to all contracts, official documents, awards, degrees or other


papers or instruments issued by the State Regents and requiring the


official signature of the State Regents. In the absence,


disqualification or disability of the chairman or secretary to act,


the vice-chairman and assistant secretary shall perform the duties


of such respective officers. The officers of the State Regents


shall have such other powers and perform such other duties as may be


prescribed by the State Regents, which shall also adopt such rules


and regulations as it deems necessary to govern its proceedings and


the conduct of its business.


(c) No member of the State Regents shall be held personally


liable for damages resulting from any negligent or wrongful act of


an employee of any institution within The Oklahoma State System of


Higher Education or of another member of the State Regents. Such


immunity shall not apply to intentional torts or grossly negligent


acts or omissions of the member.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3253 TEK 1/14/2026 11:42:34 PM



Req. No. 3253 Page 2